Alabama, session 2026rs, SB40.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 29-2-41, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§29-2-41
(a) Each member of the committee shall be entitled to
regular legislative compensation, per diem, and travel
expenses for each day he or she attends a meeting of the
committee, which shall be paid out of the funds appropriated
to the use of the Legislature, on warrants drawn on the state
Comptroller upon requisition signed by the committee's chair.
Members shall not receive additional compensation or per diem
when the Legislature is in session. The Department of
Examiners of Public Accounts shall furnish assistance and any
relevant information to the committee.
(b)(1) The committee shall have the responsibility of
reviewing contracts for personal or professional services with
private entities or individuals to be paid out of appropriated
funds, federal or state, on a state warrant issued as
recompense for those services.
Page 1

recompense for those services.
SB40 Enrolled
(2) Each state department entering into a contract to
be paid out of appropriated funds, federal or state, on a
state warrant which is notified by the committee, shall submit
to the committee any proposed contract for personal or
professional services. Each contract shall be accompanied by
an itemization of the total cost estimate of the contract.
(c) A department, in lieu of the proposed contract, may
submit to the committee a letter of intent to contract. A
letter of intent to contract shall indicate the contracting
parties, the services to be performed, an itemization of the
total cost estimate of the contract, and such other
information as the department may deem pertinent to the
committee review of the contract. If a department elects to
submit a letter of intent to contract in lieu of a proposed
contract, the department shall be required to submit to the
committee for its information the contract described in the
letter of intent upon the execution of the contract.
(d) The committee shall hold a hearing to review and
comment where necessary on any contract or letter of intent to
contract, including a recommendation that the Governor not
sign a contract, within a reasonable time not to exceed 45
days after a department has submitted the contract or letter
of intent to contract to the committee. If the committee fails
to hold a hearing to review a contract or letter of intent to
contract within the 45-day time period, the contract shall be
deemed to have been reviewed in compliance with this section.
The committee may hold a contract considered at a meeting for
up to 45 days following the meeting to review and comment on
Page 2

up to 45 days following the meeting to review and comment on
SB40 Enrolled
the contract.
(e) Any contract made by the state or any of its
agencies or departments in violation of this section and
without prior review by the committee of either the contract
or the letter of intent to contract shall be void ab initio.
(f) The committee may issue subpoenas for any witnesses
and require the production of any documents or contracts the
committee deems necessary to examine in order to conduct its
duties.
(g) The committee shall organize itself at the first
meeting following a new quadrennium and elect from among its
membership a chair and a vice-chair vice chair. Any committee
member reelected to a new quadrennium shall continue to serve
on the committee until such time the committee reorganizes
itself.
(h) The committee shall hold regular meetings at least
once each month, the regular meetings to be held during the
first week of each month."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
SB40 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB40
Senate 05-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.

100
101
102
103 House of Representatives
104 Passed: 17-Mar-26
105
106
107
108
109 By: Senator Givhan
Page 4